Utah statutes.
26-21-8.   License required -- Not assignable or transferable -- Posting --
Expiration and renewal -- Time for compliance by operating facilities.
(1) (a)  A person or governmental unit acting severally or jointly with any
other person or governmental unit, may not establish, conduct, or maintain a
health care facility in this state without receiving a license from the
department as provided by this chapter and the rules of the committee.
(b)  This Subsection (1) does not apply to facilities that are exempt under
Section 26-21-7.
(2)  A license issued under this chapter is not assignable or transferable.
(3)  The current license shall at all times be posted in each health care
facility in a place readily visible and accessible to the public.
(4) (a)  The department may issue a license for a period of time not to exceed
24 months from the date of issuance to health care facilities that meet the
provisions of this chapter and department rules adopted pursuant to this
chapter.
(b)  Each license expires at midnight on the day designated on the license as
the expiration date, unless previously revoked by the department.
(c)  The license shall be renewed upon completion of the application
requirements, unless the department finds the health care facility has not
complied with the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant to
this chapter.
(5)  A license may be issued under this section only for the operation of a
specific facility at a specific site by a specific person.
(6)  Any health care facility in operation at the time of adoption of any
applicable rules as provided under this chapter shall be given a reasonable
time for compliance as determined by the committee.
